District of Columbia statutes.
21-147

Sale of infant’s principal for maintenance or education.

When it appears, upon the verified petition of a guardian, or in a case of his refusal to act, a next friend of an infant, and the appearance and answer of the infant by guardian to be appointed by the court, and proof by deposition of one or more disinterested witnesses, that a sale of the principal of the infant’s estate, or of a part thereof, whether real or personal, is necessary for his maintenance or education, regard being had to his condition and prospects in life, the Probate Court may decree the sale on terms which to it seem proper.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 742, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Nonresident infants, appointment of ancillary guardian, see §§ 21-111, 21-112.
Probate court proceedings, see § 16-3101 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 21-147.
1973 Ed., § 21-147.